Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4799.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 44b. (1) For All of the following apply for purposes of
determining the date payment of the tax is received under this act:
, the
(a) The date of a United States postal service Postal Service
or other common carrier's postmark may must be considered the date
of receipt . However, a tax payment shall not be considered
received prior to 7 calendar days before the date of actual
receipt. This section does not apply to the payment of the tax
prior to the sale provided under section 60.if the postmark date is
JHM H02871'25 (H-4) v8eacd


not less than 5 days prior to an applicable due date and the
taxpayer can provide adequate documentation of the validity of the
postmark date.
(b) If a postmark date is later than the postmark date
described in subdivision (a) but not later than an applicable due
date, the postmark date may be considered the date of receipt.
(c) If authorized electronic payment is accepted, the date a
payment is submitted on an authorized electronic payment platform
must be considered the date of receipt. As used in this
subdivision:
(i) "Authorized electronic payment" means a payment made on an
established electronic platform that is maintained or approved by
the local tax collecting unit for the collection of taxes or
assessments under this act, including payment by ACH, debit card,
or credit card transaction. Authorized electronic payment does not
include payment by external banking applications, peer-to-peer
platforms, or unverified payment intermediaries.
(ii) "ACH" means that term as defined in section 1 of 2002 PA
738, MCL 124.301.
(2) This section applies to the payment of property taxes,
assessments, or other amounts shown as payable on a property tax
statement, and all related penalties, interest, or fees, provided
that the payment is received before the date property taxes on real
property are returned as delinquent to the county treasurer under
section 78a(2).
(3) As used in this section, "due date" means the last day the
property tax bill may be paid without imposition of interest or
penalty.
Final Page
JHM H02871'25 (H-4) v8eacd